parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/ENGLISH.old/FST2/src/lex-rules.xfst
# ============================================================================
# CONTENT:      rules for plural and genitive
# 
# LANGUAGE:     ENGLISH
#
# AUTHOR:       A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:      30-Mar-2006
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -utf8 -s LEX.fst -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

define LEX

# identify tags (starting with a "+")
read regex LEX;
single char sigma net
define SIG
read regex [ %+ ?+ ] .o. SIG ;
multi char sigma net
define TAG


# -------------------------------------------
# plural markers:
define PLUR	"[s]" | "[es]" | "[*]" ;

# & or "and" 
define AND	"[&]" ;

# optional dot
define DOT	"[.]" ;

# trigger to convert category
define NA	"[Adj]" ;


define DIAC	[ NA | PLUR | AND | DOT ];

# remove tags from surface side and diacritics form lexical side
read regex [ 
	0 <- DIAC
.o.	"&" <- AND
.o.	"." <- DOT 

# convert category
.o.	%+Adj <- %+Noun || _ $[NA]
.o.	%+Gen <- %+GenS

.o. 	LEX 

.o.	AND	->  [ {and } | {&} | {& } ]  || .#. _
.o.	AND	->  [ { and } | {&} | { & } ] 
];
define LEX


# -------------------------------------------------------------------
# apply some rules

define CONS	[b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q (u)|r|s|t|v|w|x|z];
define APOS	%';
define SEP	%- | %  ;

read regex	[

	LEX

# plural forms

# irregular forms
.o.	{man} "[*]" -> {men} 	|| _ $%+Pl		# Scotchman+s -> Scotchmen
.o.	"[*]" -> {ren}		|| {child} _ $%+Pl	# child -> children

# regularities
.o.	"[s]" -> s		|| _ DOT $%+Pl		# Dr[s]. -> Drs.
.o.	"[s]" -> "[es]"		|| [ s | x | z ] _	# box[s] -> boxes
.o.	"[s]" (->) "[es]"	|| [ c h ] _		# bench[s] -> benches

.o.	y -> {ie}  		|| CONS _ "[s]" $%+Pl	# territory[s] -> territories
.o.	"[s]"  -> s		|| _ $%+Pl		# house[s] -> houses, cat[s] -> cats
.o.	"[es]" -> {es}		|| _ $%+Pl 		# archipelago[es] -> archipelagoes

# genitive 's 
.o.	%+GenS (->) APOS  || [ s | x | z ] $%+Sg	_ 
.o.	%+GenS -> APOS  || [ s | x | z ] $%+Pl	_ 
.o.	%+GenS -> {'s}


# some short forms (in proper names):
.o.	{Fort} 		(->) {Ft} (%.)  || _ SEP
.o.	{Mountain} 	(->) {Mtn} (%.)	|| _ SEP
.o.	{Mount} 	(->) {Mt} (%.)	|| _ SEP
.o.	{Saint} 	(->) {St} (%.)	|| _ SEP 
.o.	{Sankt} 	(->) {St} (%.)	|| _ SEP 

# clean up any remaining tags and diacritics
.o.	DOT	->  [ %. | 0 ]

.o.	[ TAG | DIAC ] -> 0

];
